Washington statutes.
RCW 10.77.940

Equal application of 1989 c 420—Evaluation for developmental disability.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1359-S2.SL) ***

The provisions of chapter 420, Laws of 1989 shall apply equally to persons in the custody of the department on May 13, 1989, who were found by a court to be not guilty by reason of insanity or incompetent to stand trial, or who have been found to have committed acts constituting a felony pursuant to RCW 71.05.280(3) and present a substantial likelihood of repeating similar acts, and the secretary shall cause such persons to be evaluated to ascertain if such persons are developmentally disabled for placement in a program specifically reserved for the treatment and training of persons with developmental disabilities.

[ 1999 c 13 s 4; 1989 c 420 s 17.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Construction—1999 c 13: See note following RCW 10.77.010.